Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1234
Exploratory wells; agreement to decommission required; failure to plug; effect.

Any licensed water well contractor constructing a water well for any customer shall as a part of the agreement include the proper decommissioning of each water well constructed to explore for ground water pursuant to the agreement. Any failure to properly plug any such water well pursuant to such agreement shall subject him or her to suspension, revocation, or refusal of renewal of his or her license.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 34;

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 19.